Alaska, session 34, HB344.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 03 * Section 1. AS 37.14 is amended by adding a new section to read: 04 Article 12. Opioid Litigation Settlement Fund. 05 Sec. 37.14.900. Opioid litigation settlement fund established. (a) The opioid 06 litigation settlement fund is established as a separate fund in the state treasury. The 07 legislature may appropriate to the fund settlement proceeds received by the state from 08 manufacturers or distributors of opioids and income from the fund. 09 (b) The Department of Revenue may spend money in the fund for opioid 10 remediation in compliance with settlement agreements between the state and 11 manufacturers or distributors of opioids and to pay the costs to manage the fund. 12 (c) Money in the fund does not lapse. 13 (d) Nothing in this section creates a dedicated fund. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.